District of Columbia statutes.
23-109

Powers of investigators assigned to United States Attorney.

Any special investigator appointed by the Attorney General and assigned to the United States Attorney for the District shall have authority to execute all lawful writs, process, and orders issued under authority of the United States, and command all necessary assistance to execute his duties, and shall have the same powers to make arrests as are possessed by members of the Metropolitan Police Department of the District of Columbia.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 608, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 14(a), 44 DCR 1408

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-109.
1973 Ed., § 23-109.